Washington statutes.
RCW 34.05.510

Relationship between this chapter and other judicial review authority.

This chapter establishes the exclusive means of judicial review of agency action, except:

(1) The provisions of this chapter for judicial review do not apply to litigation in which the sole issue is a claim for money damages or compensation and the agency whose action is at issue does not have statutory authority to determine the claim.

(2) Ancillary procedural matters before the reviewing court, including intervention, class actions, consolidation, joinder, severance, transfer, protective orders, and other relief from disclosure of privileged or confidential material, are governed, to the extent not inconsistent with this chapter, by court rule.

(3) To the extent that de novo review or jury trial review of agency action is expressly authorized by provision of law.

[ 1988 c 288 s 501.]